Nevada, session 83, AB63.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 41 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
As used in NRS 41.900 to 41.970, inclusive, unless the context
otherwise requires, “incarcerated” means confined in a local
detention facility, county jail or state prison.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 41.900 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.900 1. A person who is not currently incarcerated for any
offense may bring a civil action for his or her wrongful conviction
against this State in a district court seeking damages or other relief
provided by NRS 41.950.
2. The court shall award damages for wrongful conviction in
accordance with NRS 41.950 if the person proves by a
preponderance of the evidence that:
(a) He or she was convicted of a felony in this State and was
subsequently imprisoned for the conviction;
(b) He or she did not commit the felony for which he or she was
convicted and the person:
(1) Was not an accessory or accomplice to the acts that were
the basis of the conviction;
(2) Did not commit the acts that were the basis of the
conviction; and
(3) Did not aid, abet or act as an accomplice or accessory to a
person who committed the acts that were the basis of the conviction;
(c) He or she was not convicted of an offense necessarily
included in the offense charged;
(d) Any of the following occurred:
(1) The judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated ,
[and] the charging document was dismissed [;
(2) The] and the basis for reversing or vacating the judgment
of conviction was not legal error that was unrelated to his or her
innocence [, and if a court ordered] ;
(2) The judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated
and, following a new trial, the person was found not guilty at the
-
*AB63_R1*

– 3 –
new trial or the person was not retried and the charging document
was dismissed; or
(3) The person was pardoned by the State Board of Pardons
Commissioners on the grounds that he or she was innocent; and
(e) The person did not commit perjury or fabricate evidence at
the criminal proceeding that brought about his or her felony
conviction and the person did not by his or her own conduct cause
or bring about his or her felony conviction.
3. The court, in exercising its discretion as permitted by law
regarding the weight and admissibility of evidence, may, in the
interest of justice, give due consideration to:
(a) The difficulty of providing evidence caused by the passage
of time;
(b) The death or unavailability of a witness;
(c) The destruction of evidence; or
(d) Any other factor not caused by the person or any other
person acting on his or her behalf.
4. The court may appoint an attorney to aid a person in an
action brought pursuant to this section.
5. For the purposes of subsection 2, the following do not
constitute committing perjury, fabricating evidence or causing or
bringing about the conviction of the person:
(a) A confession or an admission later found to be false; or
(b) If the judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated and
the charging document dismissed, a guilty plea for a felony.
6. As used in this section, “innocence” means that a person did
not engage in:
(a) The conduct for which he or she was convicted; and
(b) Any conduct constituting a lesser included or inchoate
offense of the crime for which he or she was convicted.
Sec. 2. NRS 41.950 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.950 1. In an action brought pursuant to NRS 41.900 which
results in the court entering a certificate of innocence pursuant to
NRS 41.910, the court shall award the person:
(a) If the person was imprisoned for:
(1) One to 10 years, $50,000 for each year the person was
imprisoned for his or her wrongful conviction;
(2) Eleven to 20 years, $75,000 for each year the person was
imprisoned for his or her wrongful conviction; or
(3) Twenty-one years or more, $100,000 for each year the
person was imprisoned for his or her wrongful conviction; and
(b) Not less than $25,000 for each year the person was on parole
or not less than $25,000 for each year the person was required to
register as a sex offender, whichever period of time was greater.
-
*AB63_R1*

– 4 –
2. In addition to any damages awarded pursuant to subsection
1, the court may award:
(a) Reasonable attorney’s fees, not to exceed $25,000, unless a
greater amount is authorized by a court upon a finding of good
cause shown.
(b) Subject to the limitations in subsection 6, [payment]
reimbursement for the cost of:
(1) Tuition, books and fees for the person to enroll in any
course or academic program at an institution operated by the
Nevada System of Higher Education commenced not later than 3
years and completed not later than 10 years after the date the award
of damages is issued pursuant to subsection 1.
(2) Participation by the person in Medicare or Medicaid, if
the person is eligible for Medicare or Medicaid, or a qualified health
plan offered on the health insurance exchange administered by the
Silver State Health Insurance Exchange which has been designated
by the Exchange as a Bronze or Silver plan, if the person is not
eligible for Medicare or Medicaid. The court shall not award
payment pursuant to this subparagraph for any period in which the
person is enrolled in an employer-based health insurance plan.
(3) Programs for reentry into the community for the person
commenced not later than 3 years and completed not later than 5
years after the date the award of damages is issued pursuant to
subsection 1.
(4) Counseling services for the person commenced not later
than 2 years after the date the award of damages is issued pursuant
to subsection 1.
(5) Housing assistance in an amount not greater than $15,000
per year.
(6) Programs for assistance for financial literacy for the
person commenced not later than 2 years and completed not later
than 3 years after the date the award of damages is issued pursuant
to subsection 1.
(7) Any other relief.
(c) Reimbursement for:
(1) Restitution ordered to be paid by the person in the
criminal proceeding for which he or she was wrongfully convicted;
and
(2) Medical care paid for by the person while he or she was
imprisoned for his or her wrongful conviction.
[(d) Any other relief.]
3. Any award of damages issued pursuant to subsection 1 must
be rounded up to the nearest half year.
4. A court shall not award and a person shall not receive
compensation for any period of imprisonment during which the
-
*AB63_R1*

– 5 –
person was concurrently serving a sentence for a conviction of
another offense for which the person was lawfully convicted and
[imprisoned.] incarcerated.
5. If counseling services are awarded to the person pursuant to
subsection 2, the person may select a relative to receive counseling
with the person. As used in this subsection, “relative” means a
person who is related by blood, adoption, marriage or domestic
partnership within the third degree of consanguinity or affinity.
6. A court shall not award payment pursuant to paragraph (b)
of subsection 2:
(a) In an amount greater than $100,000 in a calendar year.
(b) For a length of time that exceeds the period of time
described in subsection 1 during which the person was imprisoned
or on parole.
7. As used in this section, “qualified health plan” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 695I.080.
Sec. 3. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to an
action for wrongful conviction that is filed on or after the effective
date of this act.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB63_R1*